Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4680.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 396. (1) A person An individual who intentionally conceals his or her the individual's identity by wearing a mask or other device covering his or her the individual's face for the purpose of facilitating the commission of a crime is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (2) If an individual is wearing a mask or other device covering the individual's face and either of the following applies, a law enforcement officer may stop the individual and request the individual to remove the mask or other device and provide identification or otherwise provide the individual's identity: (a) An individual is wearing a mask or other device covering the individual's face for the purpose of concealing the individual's identity with the intent to threaten, intimidate, injure, or oppress another individual or group of individuals. (b) An individual is wearing a mask or other device covering the individual's face while violating a law of this state or a local ordinance. (3) An individual who refuses to comply with a law enforcement officer's request under subsection (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.